District of Columbia statutes.
31-3303.13

Alternative methods.

A health maintenance organization may use alternative methods to an affiliation period to address adverse selection provided that they are approved by the Commissioner prior to their use.

History

Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-209, § 313, 45 DCR 8433

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-1043.

Temporary Addition of Section

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-3301.01.

Emergency Legislation

See notes to § 31-3301.01.